District of Columbia statutes.
9-421.03

Certain roadway improvements excepted.

There shall be excepted from such assessments the cost of paving the roadway in excess of 40 feet in width where the new pavement or repaving is laid on both sides of the centerline of such roadway; the cost of paving the roadway in excess of 20 feet in width where the new pavement or repaving is laid solely on 1 side of the centerline of such roadway; the cost of paving the roadway space included within the intersection of streets, avenues, and roads, as said intersections are limited by lines normally projected from the building lines of the street, avenue, or road being improved at its point of intersection with the building lines of the intersecting streets, avenues, or roads and also the cost of paving or repaving the space within such roadways for which street railway companies are responsible under their charters or under law, on streets, avenues, or roads where such railways have been or shall be constructed.

Feb. 20, 1931, 46 Stat. 1197, ch. 246, § 3
1981 Ed., § 7-629.
1973 Ed., § 7-624.